Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3706
Insurance service, defined.

Insurance service shall mean any act by a club to sell or furnish to a member group insurance benefits covering accidental injury and death or any motor club service, except that such insurance shall be issued only by an insurance company duly authorized to do such business in this state. A club representative shall not be required to be a licensed insurance agent pursuant to Chapter 44 in connection with the sale of group insurance benefits covering accidental injury and death or other insurance covering a motor club service specifically enumerated in section 44-3707, which may be issued in conjunction with and as a part of a motor club service contract.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 6.